Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.545

Electronic monitoring or 24/7 sobriety program participation—Limitation on liability.

Local governments, their subdivisions and employees, the department of corrections and its employees, and the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and its employees are immune from civil liability for damages arising from incidents involving offenders who are placed on electronic monitoring or who are participating in the 24/7 sobriety program, unless it is shown that an employee acted with gross negligence or bad faith.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 35 s 33; 2006 c 130 s 3.]